Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-318
State colleges; dormitory funds; use.

All money received for the use of rooms in the dormitories of any of the state colleges, shall be expended by the board in repairs of such dormitory and the furniture of the same, whenever such repairs are needed.

Laws 1881, c. 78, sub. XIII, § 14, p. 376;

R.S.1913, § 7071;

C.S.1922, § 6706;

C.S.1929, § 85-315;

R.S.1943, § 85-318;

Laws 1969, c. 852, § 15, p. 3204.